Hawaii statutes.
§605-13 District courts, cases involving
military vehicles. Any legal officer of the United States military forces,
to the extent that the officer is authorized or required by the officer's
respective branch of service, may without license represent military personnel
in the district courts in any case which arises out of the driving of a
military vehicle. [L 1878, pt of c 31; am L 1886, c 63; RL 1925, §2317; RL
1935, §3615; RL 1945, §9713; am L Sp 1949, c 38, §1; RL 1955, §217-13; HRS
§605-13; am L 1972, c 190, §1; am L 1972, c 184, §1(g) as superseded by L 1973,
c 33, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next